Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-713 Sale, encumbrance, or
transaction involving conflict of interest; voidable; exceptions.
Any sale or encumbrance to the personal representative, the personal
representative's spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, agent, or attorney, or any
corporation or trust in which the personal representative has a substantial
beneficial interest, or any transaction which is affected by a substantial
conflict of interest on the part of the personal representative, is voidable by
any person interested in the estate except one who has consented after fair
disclosure, unless:

(1) The will or a contract entered into by the
decedent expressly authorized the transaction; or

(2) The transaction is approved by the court after
notice to interested persons. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next